District of Columbia statutes.
10-551.10

See Forever Foundation — Evans Campus.

The Department shall have the authority to direct and manage the modernization or new construction of the See Forever Foundation — Evans Campus, as authorized funds become available.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1031, 58 DCR 6226

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1011 of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).

Emergency Legislation